Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 1. Generally

§ 18-9-101.
Authority of board of commissioners to acquire property, appoint board of trustees; purposes and uses; authority to levy taxes, issue bonds or incur indebtedness; county fair fund.

Each board of county commissioners may:

Acquire lands and other property for fairgrounds, airports, parks and pleasure grounds;

Construct, maintain and operate a public auditorium, athletic fields, civic center or other community building, which may be designated as a memorial to the war veterans of the United States of America;

Appoint a board of trustees to control, maintain and manage the fairgrounds, airports, parks and pleasure grounds and to conduct agricultural, industrial and other fairs and exhibitions;

Levy taxes, issue bonds or incur indebtedness as then authorized by law for other county purposes. The taxes shall be levied and collected as are other county taxes and the taxes collected, together with other monies received shall be expended as authorized under this section. Monies in the fund shall be expended only by the board of trustees;

Dissolve any board of trustees appointed under this subsection in accordance with W.S.

18-3-525

;

Perform such other acts necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 54, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1920, §§ 1579, 1580; R.S. 1931, §§ 29-1101, 29-1102; Laws 1941, ch. 35, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 26-801, 26-802; Laws 1947, ch. 135, § 2; 1951, ch. 150, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-324, 18-325; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1991, ch. 201, § 1; 2022 ch. 92, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (a)(v); and redesignated former (a)(v) as (a)(vi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Section constitutional. —

Reference provisions of this section do not violate the constitutional restriction against extending the provisions of any law by reference to its title only. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Sections

18-9-101

to

18-9-103

held constitutional. —

See Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Chapter 150, Laws 1951, codified as §§

18-9-101

to

18-9-103

, is not void because §§

18-9-101

and

18-9-102

thereof purport to authorize the loaning of the county's credit for private purposes in violation of art. 16, § 6, Wyo. Const.Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Method of financing held constitutional. —

Public financing of the functions of the county fair board as authorized by §§

18-9-101

to

18-9-103

, is not prohibited by art. 16, § 6, Wyo. Const.Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Construction.—

Plain language of this section leads to the conclusion that appointment of a board of trustees is the only way in which a board of county commissioners can conduct a county fair. Bd. of Trs. of Laramie Cty. v. Bd. of Cty. Comm'rs of Laramie Cty., 2020 WY 41, 460 P.3d 251,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2020).

Implied authority.—

Board of county commissioners did not have implied authority to dissolve the fair board. Bd. of Trs. of Laramie Cty. v. Bd. of Cty. Comm'rs of Laramie Cty., 2020 WY 41, 460 P.3d 251,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2020).

Legislative intent in the absence of a reference to a particular bonding procedure. —

The legislature intended that the board of county commissioners should have the right and option to select and follow either of the statutory requirements then in effect and otherwise applicable to the proposed bond issue. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Legislative intent as to selection of procedure where not specified. —

In the absence of a reference to a particular bonding procedure, the legislature intended in enacting ch. 159, Laws 1951, relative to the issuance of bonds for fairgrounds, airports, parks, etc., that the board of county commissioners should have the right and option to select and follow either of the statutory requirements then in effect (§§

18-4-301

to

18-4-303

,

18-4-306

to

18-4-310

, relative to bonds generally, or §§

18-4-401

to

18-4-409

, relative to viaducts and subway bonds) and otherwise applicable to the proposed bond issue. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Legislature had knowledge of existing law. —

When the legislature amended and reenacted this section by ch. 150, S.L. of Wyoming, 1951, it did so with full knowledge of the existing condition of the law with reference to issuing bonds for county purposes. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

It is not necessary to refer to any other law to determine what right is granted,

but the exercise of such right must be in accordance with all constitutional and statutory limitations and procedures applicable thereto, whether specifically referred to in the statute or not. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

So-called reference statutes are generally recognized as a valid method of legislation

and are frequently used to avoid encumbering the statute books by unnecessary repetition, subject, however, to constitutional limitations. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Power to erect necessarily includes equipment. —

The power to erect should be construed as impliedly and necessarily including required equipment which becomes a permanent part of the building authorized to be constructed. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Question on ballot valid. —

The ballot question submitted to the electors contained only 1 general proposition, although it encompassed more than 1 of the related facilities authorized by the statutes of this state. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Piecemeal approval by voters not required. —

There is nothing in §§

18-9-101

to

18-9-103

which contemplates that a scheme or general plan for recreational facilities should be submitted to the voters for piecemeal approval. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Only 1 objective or general purpose involved even though 2 or more separate facilities contemplated. —

So long as the bond funds are to be used for facilities authorized by §§

18-9-101

to

18-9-103

, only one objective or general purpose is involved, even though two or more separate facilities may be contemplated. In this regard it is to be noted that §§

18-9-101

to

18-9-103

specifically leaves it to the discretion of the board of county commissioners which facilities are to be acquired, and the same legislature in enacting §§

18-9-201

and

18-9-202

authorized the board of county commissioners to establish a system of public recreation and playgrounds, and to acquire, equip and maintain land, buildings and other recreational facilities. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Assumption that building proposal contemplates type of building authorized, etc. —

It may justly be said that §§

18-9-101

to

18-9-103

do not authorize the construction of any and all types of public buildings, but it does authorize public auditoriums or other community buildings, and in the absence of any showing to the contrary, we must assume that the building proposal referred to in the ballot contemplates only the type of public building authorized. Likewise, the term “recreational facilities” is not specifically mentioned in the Act, but most, if not all, the facilities authorized are recreational in character, and we must assume that the commissioners intend to use the bond funds for such authorized facilities. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

County commissioners should be specific as to nature, etc., of facility. —

Because of the broad and varied nature of the various facilities authorized by §§

18-9-101

to

18-9-103

, it is imperative that the board of county commissioners in exercising its discretion should be specific to the extent that the trustees will know generally the location, nature, purpose and estimated cost of each facility so authorized, and such designation should be precise enough so that it can be determined that the same are within the purposes authorized. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

In absence of statutory requirement this is not mandatory. —

Undoubtedly the better practice would be for the commissioners to make such designation as to nature of facility prior to the bond election for the edification of the voters, but in the absence of such a statutory requirement it is not mandatory in order to validate such an election. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Quoted

in

White v. Board of County Comm'rs, 77 Wyo. 246, 313 P.2d 484,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1957).

Law reviews. —

See “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Nature of estate conveyed by deed for park or playground purposes, 15 ALR2d 975.

Liability of owner or operator of park or other premises on which baseball or other game is played, for injuries by ball to person on nearby street, sidewalk, or premises, 16 ALR2d 1458.

Maintenance of auditorium, community recreational building, or the like, as governmental or proprietary function for purposes of tort liability, 47 ALR2d 544.

Judicial notice of matters relating to public thoroughfares and parks, 48 ALR2d 1102, 86 ALR3d 484.

Municipal corporation's power to exchange its real property used for a park or public square, 60 ALR2d 220.

Power of park commission to directly regulate or prohibit abutter's access to street or highway, 73 ALR2d 652.

Children's playground as nuisance, 32 ALR3d 1127.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for injuries due to condition of grounds, walks, and playgrounds, 37 ALR3d 738.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance requiring land developer to dedicate portion of land for recreational purposes, or make payment in lieu thereof, 43 ALR3d 862.

Construction of highway through park as violation of use to which park property may be devoted, 60 ALR3d 581.

Implied acceptance, by public use, of dedication of beach or shoreline adjoining public waters, 24 ALR4th 294.

Application of zoning regulations to golf courses, swimming pools, tennis courts, and the like, 63 ALR5th 607.

Standing of private citizen, association or organization to maintain action in federal court for injunctive relief against commercial development or activities, or construction of highways, or other governmental projects, alleged to be harmful to environment in public parks, other similar recreational areas or wildlife refuges, 11 ALR Fed 556.

Construction and application of § 4(f) of Department of Transportation Act of 1966 (49 U.S.C. § 1653(f)), as amended [ 49 U.S.C. § 303], and § 18(a) of Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1968 (23 U.S.C. § 138) requiring Secretary of Transportation to determine that all possible planning for highways has been done to minimize harm to public park and recreation lands, 19 ALR Fed 904.

§ 18-9-102.
Board of trustees.

The board of trustees provided by W.S. 18-9-101(a)(iii) shall be composed of not less than five (5) nor more than nine (9) competent citizens of the county appointed by the board of county commissioners. Trustees shall serve five (5) year terms which shall be staggered. The board of county commissioners shall annually appoint a successor to the trustee whose term expires. The term of each succeeding trustee shall commence on the first Monday in January next following the date of his appointment. A trustee may be appointed for successive terms.

As soon as the original board has been appointed they shall organize by electing a chairman, secretary and treasurer of the board. As soon as they organize they shall file without fee a certificate showing their organization with the county clerk and the secretary of state. Upon filing the certificate the board of trustees is a body corporate, empowered to sue and be sued under the name of “Board of Trustees of . . . . . County”.

No member of the board of trustees shall be personally liable for any action or procedure of the board. The board has perpetual existence and it is not necessary to file any certificate other than that filed upon the original organization.

Each year when a new member of the board is appointed the trustees shall meet and again organize by electing a chairman, secretary and treasurer. Each member of the board shall serve without compensation and the board treasurer shall give bond in such amount and such securities as approved by the county commissioners conditioned upon the faithful performance of his duties and the accounting for all board monies. The board may pay the secretary such compensation as proper for secretarial, accounting and other services required of him apart from his duties as a member of the board.

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 201, § 2.

If a county is without title to sufficient land it may acquire such lands as deemed necessary by gift, purchase or condemnation under the right of eminent domain.

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 201, § 2.

The county commissioners may remove any member of the board of trustees for cause without a public hearing unless the trustee requests that the action be taken during a public hearing. Vacancies on the board of trustees shall be filled by the county commissioners for the balance of the unexpired term created by the vacancy.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 150, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 18-326; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1985, ch. 80, § 1; 1991, ch. 201, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 104, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

added (h).

Laws 2012, ch. 104 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 21, 2012.

§ 18-9-103.
Authority to establish sinking fund; sources of revenue.

Each board of county commissioners may establish a sinking fund of a certain amount to be raised within a certain number of years for erecting or constructing improvements, equipping improvements already erected on a county fairgrounds or for purchasing land for a county fair. The fund is to be created and added to from taxation or from unexpended monies in the county.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 150, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 18-327; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Severability. —

Section 6, ch. 150, Laws 1951, provides that “If any section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase or word of this act is adjudged to be unconstitutional or invalid, such adjudication shall not affect the validity of the remaining portion of this act.”

Stated

in

White v. Board of County Comm'rs, 77 Wyo. 246, 313 P.2d 484,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1957).

§
18-9-104.
Authority to establish county fair endowment fund; sources of revenue.

Each board of county commissioners may establish a county fair endowment fund.

The county fair endowment fund may accept grants, gifts, transfers, bequests and donations including those that are limited in their purposes by the grantor.

The county treasurer shall invest funds received under this section as permitted by law and the interest accruing from the investment shall be retained in the fund.

Endowment funds may be expended by the board of county commissioners or, if authorized by the board of county commissioners, the county fairgrounds board of trustees for purposes of erecting or constructing improvements, equipping improvements already erected on a county fairgrounds, purchasing land for county fairgrounds or operating county fairs.

History.

2019 ch. 97, § 1, effective February 26, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 97 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2019.